Washington statutes.
RCW 16.49.085

Violations of chapter or rules—Investigation by director—Subpoenas.

The director may investigate any violation or possible violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter. To assist in such investigation, the director may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or to compel production of records or documents anywhere in the state.

[ 2000 c 99 s 9; 1987 c 77 s 10. Formerly RCW 16.49.710.]

NOTES:

Savings—1987 c 77: See note following RCW 16.49.015.